Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 5 Natural Gas Competition and Deregulation

Administrative rules and regulations.

Marketer’s Certificates of Authority, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia, Georgia Public Service Commission, Gas, Utilities, Chapter 515-7-3.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the enactment of this article, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 264 (1997).

46-4-150.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Natural Gas Competition and Deregulation Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-150

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 enactment of this chapter, see 19 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 285 (2002).

46-4-151.
Legislative findings and intent; bill of rights for consumers.

The General Assembly finds:

It is in the public interest to establish a new regulatory model for the natural gas industry in Georgia to reflect the transition to a reliance on market based competition as the best mechanism for the selection and provision of natural gas services at the most efficient pricing;

In order to ensure the implementation of this new reliance on market based competition, any regulatory impediments, whether statutory or administrative, to competition for natural gas services must be removed in those areas of the natural gas industry where competition actually exists;

All consumers deserve to receive natural gas service on reasonable terms and at reasonable prices; and

That protecting natural gas consumers in this new reliance on market based competition is the most important factor to consider in any decisions to be made in accordance with this article.

It is the intent of this article to:

Promote competition in the natural gas industry;

Protect the consumer during and after the transition to a competitive natural gas market;

Maintain and encourage safe and reliable natural gas service;

Deregulate those components of the natural gas industry subject to actual competition;

Continue to regulate those natural gas services subject to monopoly power;

Promote an orderly and expeditious transition of the natural gas industry toward fully developed competition;

Provide for rate-making methods which the General Assembly finds appropriate for the provision of natural gas services, including without limitation the use of straight fixed variable rate design, the recovery of certain stranded costs, and the use of alternative forms of rate regulation;

Allow gas companies the opportunity to compete effectively in a competitive marketplace;

Provide a bill of rights for consumers as follows:

All consumers must have access to reliable, safe, and affordable gas service, including high quality customer service;

All consumers must have the right to receive accurate, easily understood information about gas marketers, services, plans, terms and conditions, and rights and remedies. The information must be unbiased, accurate, and understandable in a written form, which allows for comparison of prices and terms of service;

All consumers must receive the benefits of new services, technological advances, improved efficiency, and competitive prices;

Standards for protecting consumers in matters such as deposit and credit requirements, service denials and terminations, and deferred payment provisions must be applied fairly to all consumers;

All consumers must be protected from unfair, deceptive, fraudulent, and anticompetitive practices, including, but not limited to, practices such as cramming, slamming, and providing deceptive information regarding billing terms and conditions of service;

All consumers shall receive accurate and timely bills from their marketers;

All consumers are entitled to protection of their privacy and must be protected from improper use of their customer records or payment histories without their express consent;

All consumers must be protected from price increases resulting from inequitable price shifting; and

Provide that, in the event of any conflict between paragraph (9) of this subsection and any other paragraph of this subsection, the provisions of paragraph (9) shall override such other paragraph or paragraphs.

All consumers have the right to a fair and efficient process for resolving differences with marketers, including a system of internal review and an independent system of external review; and

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-151

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 6.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, in subsection (a), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(1), substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(2), and added paragraphs (a)(3) and (a)(4); in subsection (b), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (b)(7), substituted a semicolon for a period at the end of paragraph (b)(8), and added paragraphs (b)(9) and (b)(10).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

46-4-152.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Adequate market conditions” means the existence of market conditions in relation to distribution service within a particular delivery group that have been determined pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 46-4-156 to warrant customer assignment.

“Affiliate” means another person which controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with such person.

“Ancillary service” means a service that is ancillary to the receipt or delivery of natural gas, including without limitation storage, balancing, peaking, and customer services.

“Commodity sales service” means the sale of natural gas exclusive of any distribution or ancillary service.

(4.1)

“Consumer” means a retail customer of commodity sales service or of firm distribution service who uses such service or services primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

“Control” includes without limitation the possession, directly or indirectly and whether acting alone or in conjunction with others, of the authority to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a person. A voting interest of 10 percent or more creates a rebuttable presumption of control. A voting interest of 25 percent or more is deemed to constitute control. The term control includes the terms controlling, controlled by, and under control with.

(5.1)

“Cramming” means billing for goods or services not requested or authorized by a consumer.

“Customer assignment” means the process described in subsection (e) of Code Section 46-4-156 whereby retail customers within a particular distribution group who are not under contract for distribution service from a marketer are randomly assigned to certificated marketers.

“Customer service” means a function related to serving a retail customer including without limitation billing, meter reading, turn-on service, and turn-off service. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any person may perform one or more customer services without first becoming certificated in accordance with Code Section 46-4-153; provided, however, that such service may only be performed in compliance with all state and federal laws pertaining to the safety of natural gas pipelines and distribution systems and any other applicable safety standards.

“Delivery group” means a set of individual delivery points on one or more interstate pipeline suppliers to a gas company that may be aggregated and utilized for the distribution of gas to a particular set of retail customers.

“Distribution service” means the delivery of natural gas by and through the intrastate instrumentalities and facilities of a gas company or of a marketer certificated pursuant to Code Section 46-4-153, regardless of the party having title to the natural gas.

“Electing distribution company” means a gas company which elects to become subject to the provisions of this article and satisfies the requirements of Code Section 46-4-154.

(10.1)

“Electric membership corporation” or “EMC” means any person defined in paragraph (3) or (5) of Code Section 46-3-171.

(10.2)

“Electric utility” means any electric power company subject to the rate regulation of the commission in accordance with Code Sections 46-2-20 and 46-2-21.

(10.3)

“Electricity activities” means all activities associated with the generation, transportation, marketing, and distribution of electricity.

(10.4)

“EMC gas affiliate” means a separately organized person, the majority interest of which is owned or held by or, with respect to a cooperative, managed by one or more cooperatives or electric membership corporations and which applies to the commission for a certificate of authority pursuant to Code Section 46-4-153.

“Firm” means a type of distribution service which ordinarily is not subject to interruption or curtailment.

(11.1)

“Gas activities” means all activities associated with the transportation, marketing, and distribution of natural gas conducted by a person certificated pursuant to Code Section 46-4-153. Such term shall not mean the production, transportation, marketing, or distribution of liquefied petroleum gas.

“Interruptible” means a type of distribution service which is subject to interruption or curtailment.

(12.1)

“Low-income residential consumer” means any person who meets the definition of a person who is qualified for the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program, as promulgated by the Department of Human Services, pursuant to Code Section 46-1-5.

(12.2)

“Majority interest” means the ownership of greater than 50 percent of:

The partnership interests in a general or limited partnership;

The membership interests of a limited liability company; or

The stock in a for profit corporation which entitles the shareholder to vote and share in common or preferred dividends.

“Marketer” means any person certificated by the commission to provide commodity sales service or distribution services pursuant to Code Section 46-4-153 and ancillary services incident thereto.

“Person” means any corporation, whether public or private; company; individual; firm; partnership; or association, including a cooperative or an electric membership corporation.

(14.1)

“Regulated gas service” means gas service provided by a regulated provider of natural gas.

(14.2)

“Regulated provider of natural gas” means the entity selected by the commission to provide to consumers natural gas commodity service and ancillary services incident thereto in accordance with Code Section 46-4-166.

“Retail customer” or “retail purchaser” means a person who purchases commodity sales service or distribution service and such purchase is not for the purpose of resale.

(15.1)

“Slamming” means changing or causing a change of a consumer’s service from one marketer or provider to another marketer or provider without request or authorization from the consumer.

“Straight fixed variable” means a rate form in which the fixed costs of providing distribution service are recovered through one or more fixed components and the variable costs are recovered through one or more variable components.

“Winter heating season” means the calendar days from October 1 of one year through March 31, inclusive, of the following year.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-152

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, added paragraphs (4.1), (5.1), (10.1), (10.2), (10.3), (10.4), (11.1), (12.1), (12.2), (14.1), (14.2), and (15.1), added the last sentence in paragraph (7), substituted “and ancillary” for “or ancillary” near the end of paragraph (13), and added “, including a cooperative or an electric membership corporation” at the end of paragraph (14).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “Department of Human Services” for “Department of Human Resources” in paragraph (12.1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

46-4-153.
Certificates of authority.

No person other than a gas company or a regulated provider shall sell or offer to sell in intrastate commerce to any retail customer who receives primarily firm service within this state any commodity sales service or distribution service without first obtaining a certificate of authority from the commission covering the territory where such retail customer is located. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any person selected by an electing distribution company, a certificated marketer, or a regulated provider may perform billing and meter reading services on behalf of such entity without first becoming certificated in accordance with the provisions of this Code section, provided that a certificated marketer or a regulated provider also submits the meter reading data so obtained to the electing distribution company in a timely manner.

The commission shall have the authority to issue multiple certificates of authority with respect to a particular territory upon a showing that the applicant:

Possesses satisfactory financial and technical capability to render the certificated service;

Has a sufficient gas supply to meet the requirements of such service; and

Will offer such service pursuant to rules and contract terms which the commission finds economically viable for the territory which the marketer proposes to serve.

A showing of public convenience and necessity is not a condition for the issuance of a competing certificate of authority.

A certificate of authority shall authorize the marketer to use intrastate capacity available to it from a gas company to provide interruptible distribution service when not required by the marketer to provide firm distribution service.

A person who seeks a certificate of authority shall make an application to the commission which contains the information required by this Code section.

No later than December 31, 1997, the commission shall promulgate regulations describing the information to be included in an application for certification under this Code section and the criteria it will use in determining an applicant’s financial and technical capability. Such criteria shall seek to ensure the reliability and high quality of gas service provided to consumers, while imposing no unnecessary barriers to entry, including without limitation administrative barriers to entry.

No such application shall be filed with respect to territory covered by the certificate of public convenience and necessity of a gas company until such gas company has filed a notice of election pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 46-4-154.

Until the expiration of 15 days following the effective date of rates approved by the commission pursuant to Code Section 46-4-154 for an electing distribution company, the commission shall not approve or disapprove any complete application for a certificate of authority covering territory certificated to such electing distribution company which application is filed prior to such expiration date, and all applications for certificates of authority filed prior to such expiration date shall be considered by the commission simultaneously.

Within 60 days following such expiration date, the commission shall conduct a public hearing or hearings on all complete applications filed prior to such expiration date. Within 90 days following such expiration date, the commission shall issue its orders approving or disapproving each of such applications for a certificate of authority.

The commission shall conduct a public hearing on any application for a certificate of authority filed subsequent to such expiration date within 60 days following the filing of such application; and within 90 days following such filing, the commission shall issue its order approving or disapproving such application.

Any certificate of authority issued by the commission is subject to revocation, suspension, or adjustment where the commission finds upon complaint and hearing that a marketer has failed repeatedly or has failed willfully to meet obligations to its retail customers and consumers which are imposed by this article, regulations issued pursuant to this article, or the marketer’s certificate of authority; has engaged in unfair competition; or has abused its market position.

The commission may deny an application upon a showing that the applicant or anyone acting in concert with the applicant has a history of violations of laws, rules, or regulations designed to protect the public. The commission may revoke any certificate issued pursuant to this Code section where it finds that the marketer or anyone acting in concert with the marketer has such a history, that any information on the application was falsified or forged, that the marketer has acted unlawfully to the detriment of the public while certificated, or for any other good and valid reason where activities of the marketer are serving or could serve to mislead, deceive, or work a fraud upon members of the public. The commission shall be authorized to adopt rules and regulations to implement this subsection. In any case where it is asserted in good faith that the marketer is, has been, or may be about to become involved in activities described in this subsection, any deadline imposed under this Code section regarding the granting of certification shall be null and void until such time as such assertions can be addressed.

All gas marketers are required to continue to possess financial and technical capability to render service and offer service pursuant to contractual terms and conditions the commission from time to time finds economically viable for delivery groups served. This is a continuing obligation and may be reviewed by the commission at any time.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-153

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 8.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, in subsection (a)(1), inserted “or a regulated provider” and added the last sentence; inserted “and consumers” in the middle of subsection (d); and added subsection (f).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

46-4-153.1.
Certificates of authority for EMC gas affiliates; terms and conditions; requirements.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article or Article 4 of Chapter 3 of this title, the commission shall have authority to issue certificates of authority to an EMC gas affiliate but shall not have authority to issue certificates of authority to an electric membership corporation. The commission’s order granting a certificate of authority to an EMC gas affiliate shall include terms and conditions to govern the relationship between the electric membership corporation and its EMC gas affiliate. The terms and conditions shall be designed to prevent cross-subsidization between the provision of electricity and the provision of natural gas services, to encourage and promote fair competition in the overall retail natural gas market, and to protect the privacy of both electric and natural gas consumers.

The order by the commission pursuant to this Code section shall include the requirements set forth in this subsection, as well as such other rules as the commission shall determine are necessary to protect electric and natural gas consumers and promote competition:

To ensure that cross-subsidizations do not occur between the electricity services of an electric membership corporation and the gas activities of its gas affiliate, the terms and conditions ordered by the commission shall provide that each electric membership corporation having a gas affiliate shall:

Fully allocate all electricity activities costs and gas activities costs, including costs for any shared services, between the electric membership corporation’s electricity activities and the gas activities of its gas affiliate, in accordance with the applicable uniform system of accounts and generally accepted accounting principles, as applicable;

Develop and maintain a cost allocation manual, approved by the commission, describing the electric membership corporation’s methods of cost allocation and such other information and policies reasonably required by the commission to ensure compliance with this article and the terms and conditions ordered by the commission. Such manual shall:

Establish rules for the pricing of transactions between an electric membership corporation and its gas affiliate, including the transfer of assets between the two;

Provide that any loans from the electric membership corporation to its gas affiliate shall be at market rates, shall not reflect rates which are generally available through the use of any tax exempt financing, and may not be tied to any loans from the federal or state government;

Require the electric membership corporation and its gas affiliate to maintain separate books of accounts and records which shall, subject to the commission’s rules for treatment of trade secrets, be subject to production and inspection by the commission for the sole purpose of confirming compliance with this article, the cost allocation manual, and the terms and conditions of the gas affiliate’s certificate; and

Require the annual filing of a statement with the commission certifying the compliance by the electric membership corporation and its gas affiliate with the approved cost allocation manual; and

Not charge any costs of the gas affiliate to the electricity customers of the electric membership corporation; and

To protect customer privacy and prevent the misuse of customer information, the terms and conditions ordered by the commission shall provide that no electric membership corporation shall release any proprietary customer information to its gas affiliate without obtaining prior verifiable authorization from the customer, as determined in accordance with rules established by the commission.

The commission may require that any customer service that an electric membership corporation provides to its gas affiliate be offered to all marketers at the same rate and on the same terms and conditions as provided to the gas affiliate. Any such services provided to the gas affiliate or marketers must be on a strictly confidential basis, such that the electric membership corporation does not share information regarding one marketer with any other marketer, including an EMC gas affiliate.

The terms and conditions shall accommodate the organizational structures of electric membership corporations.

To assure separate but coordinating governance of an electric membership corporation and its gas affiliate, the terms and conditions shall prohibit more than one-half of the persons serving as members of the board of directors of a gas affiliate from at the same time serving on the board of directors of an electric membership corporation.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this Code section, the commission shall make accommodation for the specific legal requirements imposed by state or federal laws applicable to electric membership corporations and other cooperatives.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-153.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 9.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 25, 2002.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

46-4-154.
Notice of election; unbundling; rates; application requirements; surcharge on interruptibles.

A gas company may elect to become subject to the provisions of this article by filing a notice of election with the commission and by filing an application to establish just and reasonable rates, including separate rates for unbundled services. Pursuant to such application, the commission shall:

Maintain rates for interruptible distribution service at the levels set forth in the rate schedules approved by the commission and in effect on the day the gas company files a notice of election as provided for in this Code section;

After notice and hearing, establish rates for firm distribution service using a reasonable method of rate design, which may, at the commission’s discretion, include a straight fixed variable method of rate design; provided, however, that a consumer shall not be required to pay a fee for distribution service during any billing period when the consumer’s meter is turned off; and provided, further, that the method of rate design selected by the commission shall provide for recovery of the revenue requirements of the electing distribution company;

Establish separate rates and charges, which may be based on market value, for each type of ancillary service which is classified separately;

Provide for the recovery in rates of those costs which the commission determines are prudently incurred and used and useful in providing utility service; and

Provide for recovery of costs found by the commission to be stranded and necessary to provide a reasonable return, provided that only prudently incurred stranded costs that cannot be mitigated may be recovered.

In any proceeding before the commission to establish rates as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the commission shall prescribe rates for the services and cost recovery purposes specified in paragraphs (2), (3), (4), and (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section at levels which are designed to recover the costs of service of the electing distribution company as established by the commission in such proceeding. In such proceeding, the commission shall also prescribe a mechanism by which 95 percent of the revenues to the electing distribution company from rates for interruptible distribution service shall be credited to the universal service fund established for that electing distribution company pursuant to Code Section 46-4-161. Each electing distribution company is authorized to retain for the benefit of its shareholders or owners 5 percent of the revenues the electing distribution company received from rates for interruptible service. Each electing distribution company which retains 5 percent of such revenues shall make a report to the commission annually describing the benefits resulting to firm retail customers from interruptible distribution service revenues.

In addition to any other applicable filing requirements, any such application by a gas company shall include the following:

An identification of each component of natural gas service, including but not limited to commodity sales service, distribution service, and ancillary services, which are to be unbundled and offered under separate rates, together with the total costs to provide each such service by the electing distribution company including a return on investment;

Provisions for offering each unbundled service on an equal access, nondiscriminatory basis;

A description of the method by which the electing distribution company proposes to allocate its intrastate capacity for firm distribution service to a marketer based upon the peak requirements of the firm retail customers served by the marketer;

A description of the method by which the electing distribution company proposes to allocate its rights to interstate pipeline and underground storage to a marketer based upon the peak requirements of the firm retail customers served by the marketer; and

A plan for establishing and operating an electronic bulletin board by which the electing distribution company will provide marketers with equal and timely access to information relevant to the availability of firm distribution service.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, the commission shall hold a hearing regarding an application filed pursuant to this Code section and may suspend the operation of the proposed schedules and defer the use of the proposed rates, charges, classifications, or services for a period of not longer than six months.

The commission shall establish a surcharge on all customers receiving interruptible service over the electing distribution company’s distribution system sufficient to ensure that such customers will pay an equitable share of the cost of the distribution system over which such customers receive service. The commission is authorized to direct the electing distribution company or the marketers to collect such surcharge directly from the customers. Such surcharge shall be paid promptly upon receipt into the universal service fund. This surcharge shall not be applied to any hospital that has a medicare and Medicaid payor mix of at least 30 percent and has uncompensated writeoffs for the provision of charity, indigent, and free health care services of not less than 5 percent of such hospital’s annual operating expenses based on the annual hospital surveys by the Department of Community Health. This surcharge shall not be applied to any institution or property enumerated in Code Section 50-16-3, or administered or regulated under authority granted by Code Section 42-2-5 or 49-4A-6 or by Chapter 9 of Title 50.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-154

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 10; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-51/HB 228.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(2) for the former provisions which read: “Establish rates for firm distribution service using the straight fixed variable method of rate design, subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section;”; deleted former subsection (b) which read: “(b) If the commission determines that inefficiencies in the rate design or other causes in existence immediately preceding the implementation of the straight fixed variable rate design will result in a material fluctuation of rates for firm distribution service to a group of retail customers upon implementation of straight fixed variable rate design, the commission may make such adjustments to the rates for firm distribution service as it deems appropriate to phase in the straight fixed variable rate design for firm distribution service:

“(b)(1) Over a 12 month period from the date the rates filed by the electing distribution company would otherwise be effective if such material fluctuation will be less than 10 percent of the total gas charges for a group of retail customers; or

“(b)(2) Over a 24 month period from the date the rates filed by the electing distribution company would otherwise be effective if such material fluctuation will be equal to or greater than 10 percent of the total gas charges for a group of retail customers.

“However, in no event shall any such adjustment be made if the adjustment results in cross-subsidization between retail customers receiving firm distribution service and retail customers receiving interruptible distribution service or if the adjustment reduces the revenues to the electing distribution company for firm distribution service below those that would be recovered by the electing distribution company under the straight fixed variable rate without such adjustment.”; redesignated former subsections (c) through (e) as present subsections (b) through (d), respectively; in subsection (b), substituted “95 percent” for “90 percent” in the second sentence and substituted “5 percent” for “10 percent” in the last two sentences; and added subsection (e).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “the Division of Health Planning” following “hospital surveys by” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”